Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.040

Failure or refusal to make payments—Civil action.

In the event that any supplier of equipment and repair parts, upon cancellation or discontinuation of a contract by either a dealer or supplier, fails or refuses to make payment to such dealer as is required by RCW 19.98.010, the supplier is liable in a civil action to be brought by the dealer for such payments as are required by RCW 19.98.010.

[ 2002 c 236 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 277 s 4.]